Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-611
Corporate acts; how attested.

The act or acts of such corporations for all legal purposes shall be attested by the principal officer and the secretary under the seal of such corporation.

Laws 1897, c. 20, § 4, p. 186;

R.S.1913, § 611;

C.S.1922, § 505;

C.S.1929, § 24-608;

R.S.1943, § 21-611.